Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 11 Uniform Facsimile Signatures of Public Officials

35-11-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Authorized officer” means any official of this state or any of its departments, agencies, or other instrumentalities or any of its political subdivisions whose signature on a public security or instrument of payment is required or permitted.

“Facsimile signature” means a reproduction, by engraving, imprinting, stamping, or other means, of the manual signature of the authorized officer.

“Instrument of payment” means a check, draft, warrant, or order for the payment, delivery, or transfer of funds.

“Public security” means a bond, note, certificate of indebtedness, or other obligation for the payment of money, issued by this state or by any of its departments, agencies, or other instrumentalities or by any of its political subdivisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 122, § 1.

35-11-2.
Facsimile signature.

Any authorized officer may execute or cause to be executed with a facsimile signature in lieu of his or her manual signature any:

Public security; provided, that at least one signature required or permitted to be placed thereon, which may be the signature of an authorized signer of a bank, trust company or other banking or financial institution action as trustee, authenticating agent, transfer agent, or similar agent, shall be manually subscribed; and

Instrument of payment.

The facsimile signature of an authorized officer has the same legal effect as his or her manual signature.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 103, § 2.

35-11-3.
Use of facsimile seal.

When the seal of this state or any of its departments, agencies, or other instrumentalities or of any of its political subdivisions is required in the execution of a public security or instrument of payment, an authorized officer may cause the seal to be printed, engraved, stamped, or otherwise placed in facsimile thereon. The facsimile seal has the same legal effect as the impression of the seal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 122, § 1.

35-11-4.
Violation and penalty.

Any person who with intent to defraud uses on a public security or an instrument of payment: (1) a facsimile signature, or any reproduction of it, of any authorized officer; or (2) any facsimile seal, or any reproduction of it, of this state or any of its departments, agencies, or other instrumentalities or of any of its political subdivisions; is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned not more than five (5) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 122, § 1.

35-11-5.
Uniformity of interpretation.

This chapter shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 122, § 1.

35-11-6.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Facsimile Signatures of Public Officials Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 122, § 1.

35-11-7.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 122, § 1.